New York, session 2025-2026, S6650.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph 10 of subsection (i) of section 3216 of the 2 insurance law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (D) to read as 3 follows: 4 (D)(i) Coverage provided by this paragraph shall be organized and paid 5 for through a value-based arrangement pursuant to the schedule set forth 6 in this subparagraph. "Value-based arrangement" shall mean an arrange- 7 ment that financially rewards certain positive outcomes and financially 8 penalizes certain negative outcomes. For the purposes of this section, 9 a negative outcome shall include a c-section on a low risk individual. 10 (ii) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six, each insurer 11 shall enter into value-based arrangements with hospitals, federally 12 qualified health centers providing maternity services, and/or birthing 13 centers that provide at least eighty-five percent of the maternity care 14 for enrollees of such insurer. 15 (iii) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, each insur- 16 er shall enter into value-based arrangements with hospitals, federally 17 qualified health centers providing maternity services, and/or birthing 18 centers that provide at least ninety-five percent of the maternity care 19 for enrollees of such insurer. 20 § 2. Paragraph 5 of subsection (k) of section 3221 of the insurance 21 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (C) to read as follows: EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD05808-04-6 S. 6650--A 2 1 (C)(i) Coverage provided by this paragraph shall be organized and paid 2 for through a value-based arrangement pursuant to the schedule set forth 3 in this subparagraph. "Value-based arrangement" shall mean an arrange- 4 ment that financially rewards certain positive outcomes and financially 5 penalizes certain negative outcomes. For the purposes of this section, 6 a negative outcome shall include a c-section on a low risk individual. 7 (ii) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six, each insurer 8 shall enter into value-based arrangements with hospitals, federally 9 qualified health centers providing maternity services, and/or birthing 10 centers that provide at least eighty-five percent of the maternity care 11 of enrollees of such insurer. 12 (iii) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, each insur- 13 er shall enter into value-based arrangements with hospitals, federally 14 qualified health centers providing maternity services, and/or birthing 15 centers that provide at least ninety-five percent of the maternity care 16 of enrollees of such insurer. 17 § 3. Paragraph 1 of subsection (c) of section 4303 of the insurance 18 law is amended by adding a new subparagraph (E) to read as follows: 19 (E)(i) Coverage provided by this paragraph shall be organized and paid 20 for through a value-based arrangement pursuant to the schedule set forth 21 in this subparagraph. "Value-based arrangement" shall mean an arrange- 22 ment that financially rewards certain positive outcomes and financially 23 penalizes certain negative outcomes. For the purposes of this section, 24 a negative outcome shall include a c-section on a low risk individual. 25 (ii) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six, each insurer 26 shall enter into value-based arrangements with hospitals, federally 27 qualified health centers providing maternity services, and/or birthing 28 centers that provide at least eighty-five percent of the maternity care 29 of enrollees of such insurer. 30 (iii) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, each insur- 31 er shall enter into value-based arrangements with hospitals, federally 32 qualified health centers providing maternity services, and/or birthing 33 centers that provide at least ninety-five percent of the maternity care 34 of enrollees of such insurer. 35 § 4. Section 4406 of the public health law is amended by adding a new 36 subdivision 6 to read as follows: 37 6. (a) A health maintenance organization which provides coverage for 38 maternity care shall reimburse and pay for such coverage through a 39 value-based arrangement pursuant to the schedule contained in this 40 subdivision. "Value-based arrangement" shall mean an arrangement that 41 financially rewards certain positive outcomes and financially penalizes 42 certain negative outcomes. For the purposes of this section, a negative 43 outcome shall include a c-section on a low risk individual. 44 (b) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six, each health 45 maintenance organization shall enter into contracts with hospitals, 46 federally qualified health centers providing maternity care, and/or 47 birthing centers that provide value-based arrangements that provide at 48 least eighty-five percent of the maternity care for enrollees of such 49 organization. 50 (c) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, each health 51 maintenance organization shall enter into contracts with hospitals, 52 federally qualified health centers providing maternity care, and/or 53 birthing centers that provide value-based arrangements that provide at 54 least ninety-five percent of the maternity care of enrollees of such 55 organization. S. 6650--A 3 1 § 5. Section 162 of the civil service law is amended by adding a new 2 subdivision 10 to read as follows: 3 10. (a) Any contract entered into under this section shall require 4 that coverage for maternity care shall be organized and paid for through 5 a value-based arrangement pursuant to the schedule contained in para- 6 graphs (b) and (c) of this subdivision. "Value-based arrangement" shall 7 mean an arrangement that financially rewards certain positive outcomes 8 and financially penalizes certain negative outcomes. For the purposes 9 of this section a negative outcome shall include a c-section on a low 10 risk individual. 11 (b) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six, each insurer 12 shall enter into value-based arrangements with hospitals, federally 13 qualified health centers providing maternity services, and/or birthing 14 centers that provide at least eighty-five percent of the maternity care 15 of enrollees of such insurer. 16 (c) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, each insurer 17 shall enter into value-based arrangements with hospitals, federally 18 qualified health centers providing maternity services, and/or birthing 19 centers that provide at least ninety-five percent of the maternity care 20 of enrollees of such insurer. 21 § 6. Section 364-j of the social services law is amended by adding a 22 new subdivision 41 to read as follows: 23 41. (a) A managed care provider which provides coverage for maternity 24 care shall reimburse and pay for such coverage through a value- 25 based arrangement pursuant to the schedule contained in this 26 subdivision. "Value-based arrangement" shall mean an arrangement that 27 financially rewards certain positive outcomes and financially penalizes 28 certain negative outcomes. For the purposes of this section, a negative 29 outcome shall include a c-section on a low risk individual. 30 (b) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-six, each managed 31 care provider shall enter into value-based arrangements with hospitals, 32 federally qualified health centers providing maternity services, and/or 33 birthing centers that provide at least eighty-five percent of the mater- 34 nity care of enrollees of the managed care provider. 35 (c) By December thirty-first, two thousand twenty-seven, each managed 36 care provider shall enter into value-based arrangements with hospitals, 37 federally qualified health centers providing maternity services, and/or 38 birthing centers that provide at least ninety-five percent of the mater- 39 nity care of enrollees of the managed care provider. 40 § 7. This act shall take effect on the forty-fifth day after it shall 41 have become a law; provided, however, that the amendments to section 42 364-j of the social services law made by section six of this act shall 43 not affect the repeal of such section and shall be deemed repealed ther- 44 ewith. Effective immediately the addition, amendment and/or repeal of 45 any rule or regulation necessary for the implementation of this act on 46 its effective date are authorized to be made and completed on or before 47 such effective date.